Nebraska, session 109, LB75.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1202 For purposes of the Wage and Hour Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(2) Department means the Department of Labor;
(3) (1) Employ includes shall include to permit to work;
(4) (2) Employer includes shall include any individual, partnership,
limited liability company, association, corporation, business trust,
legal representative, or organized group of persons employing four or
more employees at any one time except for seasonal employment of not more
than twenty weeks in any calendar year, acting directly or indirectly in
the interest of an employer in relation to an employee, but shall not
include the United States, the state, or any political subdivision
thereof;
(5) (3) Employee includes shall include any individual employed by
any employer but shall not include:
(a) Any individual employed in agriculture;
(b) Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in or about a private
home;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or as a superintendent or
supervisor;
(d) Any individual employed by the United States or by the state or
any political subdivision thereof;
(e) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization when the employer-
employee relationship does not in fact exist or when the services
rendered to such organization are on a voluntary basis;
(f) Apprentices and learners otherwise provided by law;
(g) Veterans in training under supervision of the United States
-2-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
Department of Veterans Affairs;
(h) A child in the employment of his or her parent or a parent in
the employment of his or her child; or
(i) Any person who, directly or indirectly, is receiving any form of
federal, state, county, or local aid or welfare and who is physically or
mentally disabled and employed in a program of rehabilitation, who shall
receive a wage at a level consistent with his or her health, efficiency,
and general well-being;
(6) (4) Occupational classification means shall mean a
classification established by the Dictionary of Occupational Titles
prepared by the United States Department of Labor; and
(7) (5) Wages means shall mean all remuneration for personal
services, including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all
remunerations in any medium other than cash.
Sec. 2. Section 48-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-1203 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section
48-1203.01, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees a
minimum wage of:
(a) Nine dollars per hour through December 31, 2022;
(b) Ten dollars and fifty cents per hour on and after January 1,
2023, through December 31, 2023;
(c) Twelve dollars per hour on and after January 1, 2024, through
December 31, 2024;
(d) Thirteen dollars and fifty cents per hour on and after January
1, 2025, through December 31, 2025; and
(e) Fifteen dollars per hour on and after January 1, 2026, through
December 31, 2026.
(2) The minimum wage established in subdivision (1)(e) of this
section shall be increased on January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of
successive years, by the increase in the cost of living. The increase in
-3-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
the cost of living shall be measured by the percentage increase, if any,
as of August of the previous year over the level as of August of the year
preceding that year in the consumer price index for all urban consumers
(CPI-U) for the Midwest Region, or its successor index, as published by
the U.S. Department of Labor, or its successor agency, with the amount of
the minimum wage increase rounded up to the nearest multiple of five
cents. No later than October 15 of each year, commencing October 15,
2026, the Nebraska Department of Labor shall calculate and publish the
minimum wage rate that will take effect the following January 1.
(3) For persons compensated by way of gratuities such as waitresses,
waiters, hotel bellhops, porters, and shoeshine persons, the employer
shall pay wages at the minimum rate of two dollars and thirteen cents per
hour, plus all gratuities given to them for services rendered. For each
payment of wages made, the employer shall ensure that the The sum of
wages and gratuities received by each person compensated by way of
gratuities shall equal or exceed the applicable minimum wage rate
provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section. In determining whether
or not the individual is compensated by way of gratuities, the burden of
proof shall be upon the employer.
(4) Any employer employing student-learners as part of a bona fide
vocational training program shall pay such student-learners' wages at a
rate of at least seventy-five percent of the minimum wage rate which
would otherwise be applicable.
Sec. 3. Section 48-1203.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1203.01 (1) An employer may pay a new employee who is younger
than twenty years of age and is not a seasonal or migrant worker a
training wage of at least seventy-five percent of the federal minimum
wage for ninety days from the date the new employee was hired. An
employer may pay such new employee the training wage rate for an
additional ninety-day period while the new employee is participating in
-4-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
on-the-job training which (a) (1) requires technical, personal, or other
skills which are necessary for his or her employment and (b) (2) is
approved by the commissioner Commissioner of Labor. No more than one-
fourth of the total hours paid by the employer shall be at the training
wage rate.
(2) An employer shall not pay the training wage rate if the hours of
any other employee are reduced or if any other employee is laid off and
the hours or position to be filled by the new employee is substantially
similar to the hours or position of such other employee. An employer
shall not dismiss or reduce the hours of any employee with the intention
of replacing such employee or his or her hours with a new employee
receiving the training wage rate.
Sec. 4. (1)(a) Every employer of persons compensated by way of
gratuities as described in subsection (3) of section 48-1203 shall make
and keep for a period of not less than three years a record of each
employee's:
(i) Name, address, and occupation;
(ii) Rate of pay;
(iii) Amount of pay received each pay period; and
(iv) Hours worked each day and each workweek.
(b) The record required by this section shall be kept on or about
the premises wherein any employee is employed or at some other premises
which is suitable to the employer. The records shall be open for
inspection by the commissioner by appointment. If the records required
under this section are kept outside of this state, the records shall be
made available upon demand of the commissioner.
(2) Every employer of persons compensated by way of gratuities as
described in subsection (3) of section 48-1203 shall, on demand by the
commissioner, provide a sworn statement of any information required to be
maintained under this section. The statement shall be made upon forms and
in a manner prescribed by the commissioner.
-5-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
(3) All records and information obtained by the department under
this section are confidential, are not public records, and shall only be
disclosed by court order.
Sec. 5. (1) An employee who has a reasonable belief that an
employer is in violation of the Wage and Hour Act may submit a complaint
to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.
(2) The department shall forward complaints it determines to be
credible to the appropriate county attorney or take its own enforcement
actions, as the commissioner deems appropriate.
(3) The department shall develop forms and adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations as necessary to carry out this section.
Sec. 6. Section 48-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1205 Every employer subject to the Wage and Hour Act provisions
of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 shall keep a summary of the act sections
48-1201 to 48-1209, furnished by the commissioner Commissioner of Labor
without charge, posted in a conspicuous place on or about the premises
wherein any person subject to the act provisions of sections 48-1201 to
48-1209 is employed. Such summary shall include an advisement that an
employee who has a reasonable belief that an employer is in violation of
the Wage and Hour Act may submit a complaint to the department and
details on how to make such a complaint.
Sec. 7. Section 48-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1206 (1) The commissioner Commissioner of Labor shall have the
authority to subpoena records and witnesses related to the enforcement of
the Wage and Hour Act section 48-1203 and this section. The commissioner
or his or her agent may inspect all related records and gather testimony
on any matter relative to the enforcement of the Wage and Hour Act.
(2)(a) An employer shall not:
(i) Refuse to admit the commissioner to any place of employment;
-6-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
(ii) Fail to make, keep, and preserve any records as required by
section 4 of this act;
(iii) Falsify any record required under section 4 of this act;
(iv) Refuse to make any record available to the commissioner as
required under section 4 of this act;
(v) Refuse to provide a sworn statement as required under section 4
of this act;
(vi) Refuse to provide other nonprivileged information to the
commissioner necessary for the enforcement of the Wage and Hour Act;
(vii) Fail to comply with section 48-1205;
(viii) Discharge or in any other manner discriminate or retaliate
against an employee who has:
(A) Notified the commissioner that an employee has not been paid
wages as required by the act;
(B) Caused to be instituted any proceeding under the act; or
(C) Testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding;
(ix) Pay or agree to pay wages at a rate less than that required by
the Wage and Hour Act. Payment at such rate for any week or portion of a
week constitutes a separate offense as to each employee; or
(x) Otherwise violate any provision of section 48-1203.
(b) A violation of this subsection is (2) Any employer who violates
any of the provisions of section 48-1203 shall be guilty of a Class IV
misdemeanor.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(a)(ix) of this section,
each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) It shall be the duty of the county attorney for the county in
which any violation of the Wage and Hour Act occurs to prosecute the same
in the district court in the county where the offense occurred.
(4) Any employer who violates any provision of section 48-1203 shall
be liable to the employees affected in the amount of their unpaid minimum
wages and liquidated damages equal to the amount of such unpaid wages ,
-7-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
as the case may be.
(5) Action to recover the amount unpaid minimum wages as provided in
subsection (4) of this section may be maintained in any court of
competent jurisdiction by any one or more employees for and in behalf of
himself, herself, or themselves and other employees similarly situated,
or such employee or employees may designate an agent or representative to
maintain such action for and in behalf of all employees similarly
situated. The court in which any action is brought under this subsection
shall, in addition to any judgment awarded to the plaintiff or
plaintiffs, allow costs of the action and reasonable attorney's fees to
be paid by the defendant. In any proceedings brought pursuant to this
subsection, the employee shall not be required to pay any filing fee or
other court costs necessarily incurred in such proceedings.
Sec. 8. Section 48-1207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1207 Nothing in the Wage and Hour Act sections 48-1201 to 48-1209
shall be deemed to interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the
right of employees to bargain collectively with their employers through
representatives of their own choosing in order to establish wages or
other conditions of work in excess of the applicable minimum under the
Wage and Hour Act provisions of sections 48-1201 to 48-1209.
Sec. 9. Section 48-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1208 Any standards relating to minimum wage, maximum hours, or
other working conditions in effect on October 23, 1967, by or under any
other law of this state, which are more favorable to employees than those
applicable to such employees under the Wage and Hour Act provisions of
sections 48-1201 to 48-1209, shall not be deemed to be amended,
rescinded, or otherwise affected by the Wage and Hour Act sections
48-1201 to 48-1209 but shall continue in full force and effect.
Sec. 10. Section 48-1209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-8-

LB75 LB75
2025 2025
amended to read:
48-1209 Sections 48-1201 to 48-1209 and sections 4 and 5 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Wage and Hour Act.
Sec. 11. Original sections 48-1202, 48-1203.01, 48-1205, 48-1206,
48-1207, 48-1208, and 48-1209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 48-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-9-